Hawaii statutes.
§508D-13 Later material facts.
Information in a disclosure statement that has not been disclosed or becomes
inaccurate regarding a material fact as a result of an act, agreement, or
occurrence (or otherwise becomes known to seller) after the statement is
provided to the buyer does not violate this chapter. However, if such
information directly, substantially, and adversely affects the value of the
residential real property, the seller shall provide an amended disclosure
statement to the buyer disclosing the material fact within ten calendar days
after the seller's discovery of such information if the seller discovers such
information prior to the recorded sale of the residential real property, and in
any event, no later than twelve noon of the last business day prior to the
recorded sale of the real property. The buyer shall have fifteen calendar days
to examine the amended disclosure statement and, if the buyer was not already
aware of such information, to rescind the real estate purchase contract in accordance
with section 508D-5(b) or (c). The buyer's right to rescind the real estate
purchase contract under this section shall not apply if the sale of the
residential real property has been recorded; provided that the buyer may pursue
all additional remedies provided by law. [L 1994, c 214, pt of §2; am L 1995, c
108, §2; am L 1996, c 161, §13; am L 2001, c 224, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next